Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.230

Statute tolled by judicial proceedings.

When the commencement of an action is stayed by injunction or a statutory prohibition, the time of the continuance of the injunction or prohibition shall not be a part of the time limited for the commencement of the action.

[Code 1881 s 40; 1877 p 10 s 41; 1854 p 365 s 14; RRS s 172.]